Hawaii statutes.
§533-6 Not in lands held by husband as
mortgagee. A widow shall not be endowed of lands conveyed to her husband
by way of mortgage, unless he acquired an absolute estate therein during
marriage. [CC 1859, §1304; RL 1925, §3022; RL 1935, §4835; RL 1945, §12105; RL
1955, §319-6; HRS §533-6]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next